Hawaii, session 2026, HB592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $43,100,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-first representative district, as follows: 1.   Admiral Arthur W. Radford high school Design and construction for campus-wide electrical upgrades. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,500,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 2.   Admiral Arthur W. Radford high school Design and construction for the replacement of five portable classrooms. Design                         $500,000 Construction                 $2,500,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 3.   Admiral Arthur W. Radford high school Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for artificial turf for the practice field and baseball field areas. Plans                          $300,000 Design                         $400,000 Construction                 $9,000,000 Equipment                      $400,000 Total funding                    $10,100,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 4.   Moanalua elementary school Construction for multi-purpose innovation center construction completion. Construction                 $2,900,000 Total funding                     $2,900,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 5.   Moanalua high school Design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for weight room and athletic training room construction. Design                       $3,000,000 Construction                $16,000,000 Equipment                    $1,000,000 Total funding                    $20,000,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 6.   Moanalua middle school Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for planned campus-wide electrical upgrades. Plans                           $50,000 Design                         $150,000 Construction                 $1,200,000 Equipment                      $100,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. 7.   Salt Lake elementary school Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for air conditioning installation in classrooms F-4, F-5, F-6, and F-7. Plans                          $200,000 Design                         $300,000 Construction                   $600,000 Equipment                    $1,500,000 Total funding                     $2,600,000 The sum appropriated for this capital improvement project shall be expended by the department of education. SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________